Oklahoma, session 2026, SB693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 202 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Social media platform” means a website or internet medium
that:
a. permits a person to become a registered user,
establish an account, or create a profile for the
purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view
user-generated content through such an account or
profile,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB693 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. enables one or more users to generate content that can
be viewed by other users of the medium, and
c. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact
with content generated by other users of the medium;
and
2. “User” means a person who accesses or uses a social media
platform.
B. A social media platform shall prominently display a warning
to any user who accesses the platform for the first time and to any
established user once per day. Such warning shall appear for a
duration of sixty (60) seconds, shall render the applications of the
platform unusable for such duration, and shall not be able to be
terminated by the user before the end of such duration. Such
warning shall display the following message: “WARNING. THERE IS
REASONABLE EVIDENCE TO SUGGEST THAT SOCIAL MEDIA IS HAZARDOUS TO
MENTAL HEALTH, ESPECIALLY IN YOUNG CHILDREN, TEENAGERS, AND YOUNG
ADULTS.”
C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a text
messaging platform or a platform for which the primary purpose is
related to education or health care.
D. The Attorney General is authorized to bring a civil action
against a social media platform for a violation of the provisions of
this section and to seek injunctive relief or other appropriate
relief as determined by the court.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB693 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
March 6, 2025 - DO PASS






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB693 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)